Florida, session 2026, SB396.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsections (18) and (19) of section 395.1055, 13 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 14 395.1055âRules and enforcement.â 15 (18)(a)âIn establishing rules for adult cardiovascular 16 services, The agency shall grant licensure include provisions 17 that allow for: 18 (a)âthe establishment of two hospital program licensure 19 levels, a Level I program that authorizes the performance of 20 adult percutaneous cardiac intervention without onsite cardiac 21 surgery, including rotational or other atherectomy devices, 22 electrophysiology, and treatment of chronic total occlusions, 23 and a Level II program that authorizes the performance of 24 percutaneous cardiac intervention with onsite cardiac surgery. 25 (b)1.âFor A hospital seeking licensure as a Level I program 26 must:, demonstration that, for the most recent 12-month period 27 as reported to the agency, the hospital has provided a minimum 28 of 300 adult inpatient and outpatient diagnostic cardiac 29 catheterizations or, for the most recent 12-month period, has 30 discharged or transferred at least 300 patients with the 31 principal diagnosis of ischemic heart disease and that it has 32 1.âHave a formalized, written transfer agreement with a 33 hospital that has a Level II program, including written 34 transport protocols to ensure safe and efficient transfer of a 35 patient within 60 minutes. 36 2.a.âA hospital located more than 100 road miles from the 37 closest Level II adult cardiovascular services program is not 38 required to meet the diagnostic cardiac catheterization volume 39 and ischemic heart disease diagnosis volume requirements in 40 subparagraph 1. if the hospital demonstrates that it has, for 41 the most recent 12-month period as reported to the agency, 42 provided a minimum of 100 adult inpatient and outpatient 43 diagnostic cardiac catheterizations or that, for the most recent 44 12-month period, it has discharged or transferred at least 300 45 patients with the principal diagnosis of ischemic heart disease. 46 b.âFor a hospital located more than 100 road miles from the 47 closest Level II adult cardiovascular services program, have 48 does not need to meet the 60-minute transfer time protocol 49 requirement in subparagraph 1. if the hospital demonstrates that 50 it has a formalized, written transfer agreement with a hospital 51 that has a Level II program. The agreement must include written 52 transport protocols to ensure the safe and efficient transfer of 53 a patient, taking into consideration the patientâs clinical and 54 physical characteristics, road and weather conditions, and 55 viability of ground and air ambulance service to transfer the 56 patient. 57 3.âAt a minimum, the rules for adult cardiovascular 58 services must require nursing and technical staff to have 59 demonstrated experience in handling acutely ill patients 60 requiring intervention, based on the staff memberâs previous 61 experience in dedicated cardiac interventional laboratories or 62 surgical centers. If a staff memberâs previous experience is in 63 a dedicated cardiac interventional laboratory at a hospital that 64 does not have an approved adult open heart surgery program, the 65 staff memberâs previous experience qualifies only if, at the 66 time the staff member acquired his or her experience, the 67 dedicated cardiac interventional laboratory: 68 a.âHad an annual volume of 500 or more percutaneous cardiac 69 intervention procedures. 70 b.âAchieved a demonstrated success rate of 95 percent or 71 greater for percutaneous cardiac intervention procedures. 72 c.âExperienced a complication rate of less than 5 percent 73 for percutaneous cardiac intervention procedures. 74 d.âPerformed diverse cardiac procedures, including, but not 75 limited to, balloon angioplasty and stenting, rotational 76 atherectomy, cutting balloon atheroma remodeling, and procedures 77 relating to left ventricular support capability. 78 (c)âFor A hospital seeking licensure as a Level II program 79 must demonstrate, demonstration that, for the most recent 12 80 month period as reported to the agency, the hospital has 81 performed a minimum of 1,100 adult inpatient and outpatient 82 cardiac catheterizations, of which at least 400 must be 83 therapeutic catheterizations, or, for the most recent 12-month 84 period, has discharged at least 800 patients with the principal 85 diagnosis of ischemic heart disease. 86 (d)âAs a condition of licensure as a Level I or Level II 87 program, a hospital must demonstrate all of the following: 88 1.âCompliance with the most recent guidelines of the 89 American College of Cardiology, and the American Heart 90 Association, the Society for Cardiovascular Angiography and 91 Interventions, and, for hospitals providing electrophysiology 92 services, the Heart Rhythm Society guidelines for staffing, 93 physician training and experience, operating procedures, 94 equipment, physical plant, and patient selection criteria, to 95 ensure patient quality and safety. 96 2.(e)âThe establishment of appropriate hours of operation 97 and protocols to ensure availability and timely referral in the 98 event of emergencies. 99 3.(f)âThe demonstration of A plan to provide services to 100 Medicaid and charity care patients. 101 4.(g)âFor a hospital licensed as a for adult diagnostic 102 cardiac catheterization that provides Level I or Level II 103 program for adult cardiovascular services, demonstration that 104 the hospital is participating in the American College of 105 Cardiologyâs National Cardiovascular Data Registry or the 106 American Heart Associationâs Get with the GuidelinesâCoronary 107 Artery Disease registry and documentation of an ongoing quality 108 improvement plan ensuring that the licensed cardiac program 109 meets or exceeds national quality and outcome benchmarks 110 reported by the registry in which the hospital participates. A 111 hospital licensed for Level II adult cardiovascular services 112 must also participate in the clinical outcome reporting systems 113 operated by the Society for Thoracic Surgeons. 114 (19)âThe agency may adopt rules to administer the 115 requirements of part II of chapter 408 and shall update such 116 rules as new applicable industry standards and guidelines are 117 published. 118 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.